cs: Způsob instalace nad hlavou: Lepicí (trvalá); Šroubovací; Na svorky; Zašroubovací; Popruh/výztuha; Univerzální deska; Sada držáků specifická pro vozidlo; Ostatní
it: Metodo di installazione a montaggio sopraelevato: Adesivo (permanente); A bullone; A morsetto; A vite; A cinghia/staffa; Piastra universale; Kit di staffe specifiche per veicolo; Altro
nb: Monteringsmetode for takfeste: Lim (permanent); Boltmontering; Klemmemontering; Skrumontering; Stropp/skinne; Universalplate; Kjøretøyspesifikt brakettsett; Annet
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt treo trên cao: Dính bằng keo (vĩnh viễn); Bắt bu-lông; Dạng kẹp; Bắt vít; Dây đai/thanh giằng; Tấm đế đa năng; Bộ giá đỡ dành riêng cho xe; Khác
pt-BR: Suporte superior método de instalação: Adesivo (permanente); Parafusado; Braçadeira; Rosqueado; Tira/cinta; Placa universal; Kit de suporte específico para o veículo; Outros
ru: Способ установки верхнего крепления: Клеевое (неразъемное); Болтовое; На зажимах; На винтах; Ремни/скобы; Универсальная пластина; Монтажный комплект для конкретного автомобиля; Другое
da: Installationsmetode til overliggende montering: Klæbemiddel (permanent); Boltmontering; Klemme; Skruemontering; Rem/bøjle; Universalplade; Køretøjsspecifikt beslagsæt; Andet
de: Installationsmethode der Deckenhalterung: Klebemittel (permanent); Schraubmontage (Bolzen); Klemmmontage; Schraubmontage; Gurt/Halterung; Universalplatte; Fahrzeugspezifisches Montage-Kit; Sonstige
th: วิธีการติดตั้งแบบแขวนเหนือศีรษะ: กาว (ถาวร); ขันน็อต; หนีบ; ขันสกรู; สายรัด/โครงยึด; แผ่นเพลตอเนกประสงค์; ชุดขาตั้งเฉพาะรุ่นรถ; อื่นๆ
fr: Mode d’installation du support supérieur: Adhésif (permanent); Boulonné; À pince; Vissé; Sangle/Renfort; Plaque universelle; Kit de support spécifique au véhicule; Autre
zh-TW: 頂置支架安裝方式: 黏合劑 (永久); 螺栓固定; 夾具固定; 螺絲固定; 綁帶/支架固定; 萬用底板; 車款專用支架套件; 其他
ko: 오버헤드 마운트 설치 방법: 접착식(영구); 볼트 온; 클램프 온; 스크류 인; 스트랩/브레이스; 범용 플레이트; 차량 전용 브래킷 키트; 기타
hr-HR: Metoda ugradnje iznad glave: Ljepljivo (trajno); S vijcima (bolt-on); Na stezaljku; Na uvrtanje; Traka/nosač; Univerzalna ploča; Komplet nosača specifičan za vozilo; Ostalo
sv: Installationsmetod för takfäste: Självhäftande (permanent); Fastbultad; Fastklämd; Inskruvad; Rem/fäste; Universalplatta; Fordonsspecifik monteringssats; Övrigt
en: Overhead mount installation method: Adhesive (permanent); Bolt-on; Clamp-on; Screw-in; Strap/brace; Universal plate; Vehicle-specific bracket kit; Other
nl: Bovenmontage installatiemethode: Zelfklevend (permanent); Vastgebout; Klembevestiging; Schroefbevestiging; Riem/beugel; Universele plaat; Voertuigspecifieke beugelset; Overige
hu: Felső rögzítőkonzol beszerelési módszere: Ragasztós (állandó); Csavarozható; Szorítóbilincses; Becsavarható; Pánt/heveder; Univerzális lemez; Járműspecifikus rögzítőkészlet; Egyéb
bg-BG: Метод за монтаж на таванна стойка: Залепване (перманентно); С болтове; Със скоби; С винтове; Ремък/скоба; Универсална пластина; Комплект планки, специфичен за автомобила; Друго
tr: Üstten montaj kurulum yöntemi: Yapışkanlı (kalıcı); Cıvatalı; Kelepçeli; Vidalı; Kayış/destek; Evrensel plaka; Araca özel braket kiti; Diğer
lt-LT: Viršutinio laikiklio montavimo metodas: Klijai (nuolatinis); Prisukamas varžtais; Prispaudžiamas; Įsukamas; Dirželis / laikiklis; Universali plokštelė; Konkrečios transporto priemonės laikiklių rinkinys; Kita
sk-SK: Spôsob montáže s upevnením na strop: Lepiace (trvalé); Na skrutky; Upínacie; Zaskrutkovacie; Popruh/vzpera; Univerzálna doska; Montážna súprava pre konkrétne vozidlo; Iné
fi: Kattoasennusmenetelmä: Liima (pysyvä); Pultattava; Puristinkiinnitys; Ruuvattava; Hihna/tuki; Yleislevy; Ajoneuvokohtainen kiinnityssarja; Muu
zh-CN: 顶置式安装件安装方法: 背胶（永久）; 螺栓固定; 夹钳固定; 旋入式; 绑带/支架; 通用安装板; 车型专用支架套件; 其他
ro-RO: Metoda de instalare a suportului de plafon: Adeziv (permanent); Cu prindere în șuruburi; Cu prindere în clemă; Prin înșurubare; Curea/Bratară; Placă universală; Kit de suport specific vehiculului; Altele
ja: 天井取り付け方法: 接着式 (永久); ボルトオン; クランプオン; ねじ込み式; ストラップ/ブレース; 汎用プレート; 車種別ブラケットキット; その他
pt-PT: Método de instalação de montagem suspensa: Adesivo (permanente); Aparafusado; Com braçadeira; De enroscar; Correia/cinta; Placa universal; Kit de suporte específico para o veículo; Outro
pl: Metoda montażu sufitowego: Samoprzylepny (na stałe); Przykręcane; Na zaciski; Wkręcane; Na paski/klamry; Płyta uniwersalna; Zestaw wsporników do konkretnego pojazdu; Inne
el: Μέθοδος εγκατάστασης πάνω από την οροφή: Αυτοκόλλητο (μόνιμο); Με βίδες; Με σφιγκτήρα; Βιδωτό; Ιμάντας/Στήριγμα; Πλάκα γενικής χρήσης; Κιτ βραχίονα ειδικό για το όχημα; Άλλο
es: Método de instalación del soporte superior: Adhesivo (permanente); Fijación con pernos; Fijación con abrazaderas; Fijación con tornillos; Correa/soporte; Placa universal; Kit de soportes específicos para el vehículo; Otro
sl-SI: Način namestitve stropnega nosilca: Lepilo (trajno); Privitje; Pritrditev s spono; Privitje z vijaki; Trak/vezica; Univerzalna plošča; Znamki vozila prilagojen komplet nosilcev; Drugo